course_material/08_Morphology/animals.lexc
Multichar_Symbols MEOW MOO WOOF

LEXICON Root
cat   CatSound ;
kitty CatSound ;
cowMOO:cow  # ;  ! In-place transduction; # = end-of-word
dog   DogSound ;
puppy DogSound ;

LEXICON CatSound
MEOW:0       # ;  ! MEOW on the upper tape; nothing on the lower

LEXICON DogSound
WOOF:0       # ;  ! WOOF on the upper tape; nothing on the lower
